Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2399
Governmental unit; deposits in excess of insured amount; security interest; rights.

(1) Each governmental unit depositing public money or public funds in a bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution shall have an undivided beneficial interest under the deposit guaranty bond provided and an undivided security interest in the pool of securities deposited, pledged, or in which a security interest is granted by such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution pursuant to subsection (1) of section 77-2398 in the proportion that the total amount of the governmental unit's public money or public funds held deposited in such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution secured by the deposit guaranty bond or by the pool of securities, or any combination thereof, bears to the total amount of public money or public funds so secured.

(2) The delivery by the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution designated as a depository to the director or administrator of a written receipt or acknowledgment from a federal reserve bank or branch of a federal reserve bank, a federal home loan bank, or another responsible bank which is authorized to exercise trust powers, capital stock financial institution which is authorized to exercise trust powers, or qualifying mutual financial institution which is authorized to exercise trust powers, including a bank which is authorized to exercise trust powers, capital stock financial institution which is authorized to exercise trust powers, or qualifying mutual financial institution which is authorized to exercise trust powers chartered by a foreign state agency as defined in subdivision (14) of section 8-101.03, or trust company other than the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution granting the security interest, that includes the name of the director or administrator, describes the securities identified on the books or records of the depository, and provides that the securities or the proceeds of the securities will be delivered only upon the surrender of the written receipt or acknowledgment duly executed by the director or administrator designated on the written receipt or acknowledgment and by the authorized representative of the depository shall, together with the director's or administrator's actual and continued possession of the written receipt or acknowledgment, constitute a valid and perfected security interest in favor of the director or administrator in and to the identified securities.

(3) Articles 8 and 9, Uniform Commercial Code, shall not apply to any security interest arising under this section.

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 44;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 93;

Laws 2019, LB622, § 10;

Laws 2021, LB66, § 6.